Connecticut, session 2026, SB00081.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That the Commissioner of Motor Vehicles develop a plan to privatize
the functions and operations of the Department of Motor Vehicles and
submit such plan to the joint standing committee of the General
Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to transportation on or
before October 1, 2026.